Hawaii statutes.
§431:9A-105 Insurance producer license
examination. (a) An applicant for an insurance producer license shall
pass a written examination unless exempt pursuant to section 431:9A-109. The
examination shall test the knowledge of the applicant concerning the lines of
authority for which application is made, the duties and responsibilities of an
insurance producer, and the insurance laws and rules of this State.

(b) The commissioner may make arrangements,
including contracting with an outside testing service, for administering
examinations and collecting fees pursuant to section 431:7-101. The fees
collected shall be nonrefundable.

(c) An applicant, who fails to appear for the
examination as scheduled or fails to pass the examination, shall reapply for an
examination and remit all required fees and forms before being rescheduled for
another examination.

(d) An applicant's examination scores shall be
valid for two years from the date of the examination. [L 2001, c 216, pt of §2;
am L 2002, c 155, §29; am L 2003, c 212, §58; am L 2006, c 154, §24; am L 2012,
c 66, §7]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next